District of Columbia statutes.
7-737

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4908, 48 DCR 6981
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 8 of Department of Health Functions Clarification Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-60, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5701).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4408 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001 to Regulate Barber Shops, Beauty Salons, and Massage and Spa Establishments, see Mayor’s Order 2006-10, January 27, 2006 ( 53 DCR 2711a).
Delegation of Authority under D.C. Law 14-28, the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001, see Mayor’s Order 2006-34, March 12, 2006 ( 53 DCR 5073).

Resolution 15-510, the “Air Quality Control Regulation Implementing Sections 182 and 185 of the Federal Clean Air Act Emergency Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective April 4, 2004.

Resolution 15-512, the “Air Quality Control Regulation Implementing the Severe Area Non-attainment Requirements of the Federal Clean Air Act Emergency Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective April 4, 2004.